src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_pta/bub/bui/pkaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = kirkta:kir
! V_AMPTA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:bu V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:bu N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:bu ACT_COND_type ; 
:bu ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:bu VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:p V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:p INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:bu ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_elta/leb/li/elkaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = muštelta:mušt
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:le V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:li N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:el ACT_COND_type ; 
:el ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:le VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109
:el VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:el V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:el INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:l ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

!LEXICON V_da/eb/0/kaha
!!! @LEXNAME@ = lugeda:lug OR should this be -gaha ühtnegoi
!! V_??
!!! preceding vowel always required for affix
!:e V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
!+Der+Der/NomAg+N:i N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109
!
!!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
!: ACT_COND_type ;
!:e ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
!
!:e VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109
!
!!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
!:e V-ConsonantStem_d/k ;
!!! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg
!
!!! problems with tta, ta, da
!:e INF_da ;
!
!!! preterite stem vowel
!: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_1Syl_DVta/ab/oi/DVkaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = antta:and
! V_ANTTA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:a V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:a N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:a ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

: VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:%^DEVOICE INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:o ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_TUNTTA
!! @LEXNAME@ = tuntta:tund
! V_
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:e V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:i N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
: ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

: VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:%^DEVOICE INF_ta ; !tuntta

!! preterite stem vowel
:%^TSi ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i tunzi

LEXICON V_LAEHTTA
!! @LEXNAME@ = lähtta:lä singlet
! V_
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:hte V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:hti N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:ks ACT_COND_type ;
:ht ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:ht VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:ht V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:ht INF_ta ; !tuntta

!! preterite stem vowel
:ks ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i tunzi

LEXICON V_1Syl_DVta/ub/ui/DVkaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = ampta:amb
! V_
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:u V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:u N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:u ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

: VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:%^DEVOICE INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:u ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ta/ub/ui/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = kacta:kac
! V_ASTTA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:u V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:u N_KACUI ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:u ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

: VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
: V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:u ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ta/ob/oi/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = uskta:usk
! V_
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:o V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:o N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:o ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

: VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
: V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:o ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i


LEXICON V_kta/gab/goi/ggaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = haikta:hai
! V_ANTTA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:ga V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:ga N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:ga ACT_COND_type ;
:ga ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:ga VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:k V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:k INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:go ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_kta/gab/gi/ggaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = haikta:hai
! V_KRONKTA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:ga V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:ga N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:ga ACT_COND_type ;
:ga ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:ga VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:k V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:k INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:g ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_kta/geb/gi/ggaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = polkta:pol
! V_POLKTA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:ge V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:gi N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:g ACT_COND_type ;
:ge ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:ge VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:k V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da %^DEVOICE
:k INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:g ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i
