src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
ampta+V:amb V_pta/bub/bui/pkaha ;
astta+V:ast V_ta/ub/ui/kaha ;
haikta+V:hai V_kta/gab/goi/ggaha ;
kacta+V:kac V_ta/ub/ui/kaha ;
kronkta+V:kron V_kta/gab/gi/ggaha ;
kucta+V:kuc V_ta/ub/ui/kaha ;
polkta+V:pol V_kta/geb/gi/ggaha ;
rikta+V:rik V_ta/ob/oi/kaha ;
uskta+V:usk V_ta/ob/oi/kaha ;
